District of Columbia statutes.
5-105.09

Service of process.

No later than 60 days following March 6, 2007, the Chief of Police, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, shall issue rules establishing a procedure for service of process upon sworn members of the Metropolitan Police Department for actions arising out of the performance of their duties. The rules shall include the following:

(1)

A process whereby the sworn member is notified that service of process is being attempted on him or her;

(2)

A process for notifying a process server and the public of a specific time and place where service will be made;

(3)

The designation of one or more offices, at the command level or the department’s general counsel, where service shall be accepted on behalf of the sworn member, and

(4)

The discipline to be meted out against any sworn member who avoids service of process.

History

Mar. 6, 2007, D.C. Law 16-223, § 101, 53 DCR 10221